California statutes. Education Code
 school district governing board or any student organization within the district, which does not provide equal opportunity to both sexes for participation and for use of facilities. Facilities and participation include, but are not limited to, equipment and supplies, scheduling of games and practice time, compensation for coaches, travel arrangements, per diem, locker rooms, and medical services.

(c) Nothing in this section shall be construed to require a school district to require competition between male and female pupils in school-sponsored athletic programs.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 41 by Stats. 1998, Ch. 914, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

221.8.

The following list of rights, which are based on the relevant provisions of the federal regulations implementing Title IX of the Education Amendments of 1972 (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1681 et seq.), may be used by the department for purposes of Section 221.6:

(a) You have the right to fair and equitable treatment and you shall not be discriminated against based on your
 sex.

(b) You have the right to be provided with an equitable opportunity to participate in all academic extracurricular activities, including athletics.

(c) You have the right to inquire of the athletic director of your school as to the athletic opportunities offered by the school.

(d) You have the right to apply for athletic scholarships.

(e) You have the right to receive equitable treatment and benefits in the provision of all of the following:

(1) Equipment and supplies.

(2) Scheduling of games and practices.

(3) Transportation and daily allowances.

(4) Access to tutoring.

(5) Coaching.

(6) Locker rooms.

(7) Practice and competitive facilities.

(8) Medical and training facilities and services.

(9) Publicity.

(f) You have the right to have access to a gender equity coordinator to answer questions regarding gender equity laws.

(g) You have the right to contact the State Department of Education and the California Interscholastic Federation to access information on gender equity laws.

(h) You have the right to file a confidential discrimination complaint with the United States Office of Civil Rights or the State Department of Education if you believe you have been discriminated against or if you believe you have received unequal treatment on the basis of your sex.

(i) You have the right to pursue civil remedies if you have been discriminated against.

(j) You have the right to be protected against retaliation if you file a discrimination complaint.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 271 by Stats. 2015, Ch. 43, Sec. 3.   (AB 1538)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

221.9.

(a) Commencing with the 2015–16 school year and every year thereafter, each public elementary and secondary school in the state, including each charter school, that offers competitive athletics shall publicly make available at the end of the school year all of the following information:

(1) The total enrollment of the school, classified by gender.

(2) The number of pupils enrolled at the school who participate in competitive athletics, classified by gender.

(3) The number of boys’ and girls’ teams, classified by sport and by competition level.

(b) The data required pursuant to subdivision (a) shall reflect the total number of players on a team roster on the official first day of competition.

(c) The school shall make the information specified in subdivision (a) publicly available as follows:

(1) If the school maintains an Internet Web site, by posting the information on the school’s Internet Web site.

(2) If the school does not maintain an Internet Web site, by submitting the information to its school district or, for a
 charter school, to its charter operator. The school district or charter operator shall post the information on its Internet Web site, and the information shall be disaggregated by schoolsite.

(d) The materials used by a school to compile the information specified in subdivision (a) shall be retained by the school for at least three years after the information is posted on the Internet pursuant to subdivision (c).

(e) As used in this section, “competitive athletics” means sports where the activity has coaches, a governing organization, and practices, and competes during a defined season, and has competition as its primary goal.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 258, Sec. 2.   (SB 1349)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

222.

(a) A school operated by a school district or a county office of education, the California School for the Deaf, the California School for the Blind, and a charter school shall provide reasonable accommodations to a lactating pupil on a school campus to express breast milk, breast-feed an infant child, or address other needs related to breast-feeding. Reasonable accommodations under this section include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Access to a private and secure room, other than a restroom, to express breast milk or breast-feed an infant child.

(2) Permission to bring onto a school campus a
 breast pump and any other equipment used to express breast milk.

(3) Access to a power source for a breast pump or any other equipment used to express breast milk.

(4) Access to a place to store expressed breast milk safely.

(b) A lactating pupil on a school campus shall be provided a reasonable amount of time to accommodate her need to express breast milk or breast-feed an infant child.

(c) A school specified in subdivision (a) shall provide the reasonable accommodations specified in subdivisions (a) and (b) only if there is at least one lactating pupil on the school campus.

(d) A school subject to
 this section may use an existing facility to meet the requirements specified in subdivision (a).

(e) A pupil shall not incur an academic penalty as a result of her use, during the schoolday, of the reasonable accommodations specified in this section, and shall be provided the opportunity to make up any work missed due to such use.

(f) (1) A complaint of noncompliance with the requirements of this section may be filed with the local educational agency under the Uniform Complaint Procedures set forth in Chapter 5.1 (commencing with Section 4600) of Division 1 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations.

(2) A local educational agency shall respond to a complaint filed pursuant to paragraph (1)
 in accordance with Chapter 5.1 (commencing with Section 4600) of Division 1 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations.

(3) A complainant not satisfied with the decision of a local educational agency may appeal the decision to the department pursuant to Chapter 5.1 (commencing with Section 4600) of Division 1 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations and shall receive a written decision regarding the appeal within 60 days of the department’s receipt of the appeal.

(4) If a local educational agency finds merit in a complaint, or if the Superintendent finds merit in an appeal, the local educational agency
 shall provide a remedy to the affected pupil.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 690, Sec. 2.   (AB 302)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

222.5.

(a) A local educational agency shall notify pregnant and parenting pupils of their rights and options available under the law through annual school year welcome packets and through independent study packets.

(b) A local educational agency shall annually notify parents and guardians of pupils at the beginning of the regular school term of the rights and options available to pregnant and parenting pupils under the law.

(c) For purposes of this section, “local educational agency” means a school district, a county office of education, a school operated by a school district or a county office of education, a charter school, the California Schools for the Deaf, or the California School
 for the Blind.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 942, Sec. 3.   (AB 2289)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

223.

This chapter shall not apply to the membership practices of the Young Men’s Christian Association, Young Women’s Christian Association, girl scouts, boy scouts, Camp Fire, or voluntary youth service organizations which are exempt from taxation under subdivision (a) of Section 501 of the federal Internal Revenue Code of 1954, whose membership has traditionally been limited to persons of one sex, and principally to persons of less than 19 years of age.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 914, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

224.

(a) The sex discrimination provisions of this chapter shall not be construed to prevent the American Legion or the American Legion Auxiliary from operating programs and activities undertaken in connection with the organization or operation of any Boys State conference or Girls State conference in a gender-segregated manner provided that these conferences comply with all of the following every year that the conferences take place:

(1) The conferences provide substantially similar access to government officials and facilities.

(2) The conferences provide substantially similar programming except where the
 programming relates to the role of gender in public service specifically.

(3) There are an equal number of opportunities for girls to participate in the conferences as there are for boys.

(4) Any limitations on the number of pupils that can be nominated to attend the conferences from a single high school apply equally to boys and girls, unless the high school is a single-gender high school.

(5) Pupils who do not identify as either male or female, or who do not identify with their assigned gender at birth, are allowed to participate in either
 conference.

(6) The conferences comply with all other nondiscrimination provisions of state and federal law.

(b) Provided that the Boys State conference and the Girls State conference meet all of the requirements of paragraphs (1) to (6), inclusive, of subdivision (a), the sex discrimination provisions of this chapter shall not be construed to prevent any secondary educational institution from engaging in programs or activities specifically for either of the following purposes:

(1) The promotion of any Boys State or Girls State conference.

(2) The selection of pupils to attend either of those conferences.

(c) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2023.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 1) and added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 676, Sec. 2.   (SB 363)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

224.5.

(a) There is hereby established the gender equity train-the-trainer grant program. The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall award grants from funds available for that purpose to the governing boards of school districts and county offices of education for the implementation of programs to train trainers in gender equity.

(b) The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall, with the approval of the State Board of Education, develop criteria for the grant applications . The
 Superintendent of Public Instruction shall select as grant recipients applicants that have clearly demonstrated all of the following:

(1) Grant moneys will result in the grantee providing ongoing gender training to all staff members, including certificated and classified staff, and maintaining a pool of knowledgeable gender equity trainers.

(2) The applicant has considered other available federal and state funding resources for gender equity training and coordinated those resources, as appropriate with a grant under this section.

(c) A grant application shall include an evaluation plan for determining the extent to which the expected benefits of the trainer program are being realized. The results of the evaluation shall be reported to the governing board of the school district or county board of education, as
 appropriate.

(d) The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall implement this section only in fiscal years in which sufficient funds have been appropriated for this purpose. To the extent funds are available in multiple years, the Superintendent of Public Instruction shall award grants in a manner that ensures that training is available in all parts of the state.

(e) No more than a total of one hundred thirty thousand dollars ($130,000) of state funds may be expended in any fiscal year for purposes of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 459, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

225.

This article shall not preclude father-son or mother-daughter activities at an educational institution, provided that if such activities are offered for students of one sex, opportunities for reasonably comparable activities are offered for students of the other sex.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1117, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

229.

Nothing contained in this article shall be construed to require any educational institution to grant preferential or disparate treatment to the members of one sex on account of an imbalance which may exist with respect to the total number or percentage of persons of that sex participating in, or receiving the benefits of, any state supported program or activity, in comparison with the total number or percentage of persons of that sex in any community, district, or other area. However, this section shall not be construed to prevent the consideration in any hearing or proceeding under this article of statistical evidence which tends to show that such an
 imbalance exists with respect to the participation in, or receipt of the benefits of, any state-supported program or activity by the members of one sex.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1117, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

230.

For purposes of this chapter, harassment and other discrimination on the basis of sex include, but are not limited to, the following practices:

(a) On the basis of sex, exclusion of a person or persons from participation in, denial of the benefits of, or subjection to harassment or other discrimination in, any academic, extracurricular, research, occupational training, or other program or activity.

(b) On the basis of sex, provision of
 different amounts or types of student financial aid, limitation of eligibility for student financial aid, or the application of different criteria to applicants for student financial aid or for participation in the provision of student financial aid by others. Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to prohibit an educational institution from administering, or assisting in the administration of, scholarships, fellowships, or other forms of student financial aid, established pursuant to domestic or foreign wills, bequests, trusts, or similar legal instruments or by acts of a foreign government, which require that awards be made to members of a particular sex; provided, that the overall effect of the award of these sex-restricted scholarships, fellowships, and other forms of student financial aid does not discriminate on the basis of sex.

(c) On the basis of sex, exclusion from participation in, or denial of equivalent opportunity in,
 athletic programs. For purposes of this subdivision, “equivalent” means equal or equal in effect.

(d) An educational institution may be found to have effectively accommodated the interests and abilities in athletics of both sexes within the meaning of Section 4922 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations as that section exists on January 1, 2003, using any one of the following tests:

(1) Whether interscholastic level participation opportunities for male and female pupils are provided in numbers substantially proportionate to their respective enrollments.

(2) Where the members of one sex have been and are underrepresented among interscholastic athletes, whether the school district can show a history and continuing practice of program expansion that is demonstrably responsive to the developing interest and
 abilities of the members of that sex.

(3) Where the members of one sex are underrepresented among interscholastic athletes, and the institution cannot show a history and continuing practice of program expansion as required in paragraph (2), whether the school district can demonstrate that the interest and abilities of the members of that sex have been fully and effectively accommodated by the present program.

(e) If an educational institution must cut its athletic budget, the educational institution shall do so consistently with its legal obligation to comply with both state and federal gender equity laws.

(f) It is the intent of the Legislature that the three-part test articulated in subdivision (d) be interpreted as it has been in the policies and regulations of the Office of Civil Rights in effect on January 1,
 2003.

(g) On the basis of sex, harassment or other discrimination among persons, including, but not limited to, students and nonstudents, or academic and nonacademic personnel, in employment and the conditions thereof, except as it relates to a bona fide occupational qualification.

(h) On the basis of sex, the application of any rule concerning the actual or potential parental, family, or marital status of a person, or the exclusion of any person from any program or activity or employment because of pregnancy or related conditions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 660, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

231.

Nothing herein shall be construed to prohibit any educational institution from maintaining separate toilet facilities, locker rooms, or living facilities for the different sexes, so long as comparable facilities are provided.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1117, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

231.5.

(a) It is the policy of the State of California, pursuant to Section 200, that all persons, regardless of their sex, should enjoy freedom from discrimination of any kind in the educational institutions of the state. The purpose of this section is to provide notification of the prohibition against sexual harassment as a form of sexual discrimination and to provide notification of available remedies.

(b) Each educational institution in the State of California shall have a written policy on sexual harassment. It is the intent of the Legislature that each educational institution in this state include this policy in its regular policy statement rather than distribute an additional written document.

(c) The educational institution’s written policy on sexual harassment shall include information on where to obtain the specific rules and procedures for reporting charges of sexual harassment and for pursuing available remedies.

(d) A copy of the educational institution’s written policy on sexual harassment shall be displayed in a prominent location in the main administrative building or other area of the campus or schoolsite. “Prominent location” means that location, or those locations, in the main administrative building or other area where notices regarding the institution’s rules, regulations, procedures, and standards of conduct are posted. 

(e) A copy of the educational institution’s written policy on sexual harassment, as
 it pertains to pupils, shall be provided as part of any orientation program conducted for new and continuing pupils at the beginning of each quarter, semester, or summer session, as applicable.

(f) A copy of the educational institution’s written policy on sexual harassment shall be provided for each faculty member, all members of the administrative staff, and all members of the support staff at the beginning of the first quarter or semester of the school year, or at the time that there is a new employee hired.

(g) A copy of the educational institution’s written policy on sexual harassment shall appear in any publication of the institution that sets forth the comprehensive rules, regulations, procedures, and standards of conduct for the institution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 428, Sec. 1.   (AB 543)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

231.6.

(a) Each schoolsite in a school district, county office of education, or charter school, serving pupils in any of grades 9 through 12, inclusive, shall create a poster that notifies pupils of the applicable written policy on sexual harassment described in Section 231.5.

(b) The schoolsite may partner with local, state, or federal agencies, or nonprofit organizations, for purposes of the design and content of the poster.

(c) The language in the poster shall be age appropriate and culturally relevant, and the schoolsite may partner with local, state, or federal agencies, or nonprofit organizations, for these purposes.

(d) The poster shall
 be displayed in English and any primary language spoken by 15 percent or more of the pupils enrolled at the schoolsite as determined pursuant to Section 48985.

(e) The poster shall be no smaller than 8.5 by 11 inches and use at least 12-point type.

(f) The poster shall display, at a minimum, all of the following:

(1) The rules and procedures for reporting a charge of sexual harassment.

(2) The name, phone number, and email address of an appropriate schoolsite official to contact to report a charge of sexual harassment.

(3) The rights of the reporting pupil, the complainant, and the respondent, and the responsibilities of the schoolsite in accordance with the applicable written policy on
 sexual harassment.

(g) (1) The poster shall be prominently and conspicuously displayed in each bathroom and locker room at the schoolsite.

(2) (A) The poster may be prominently and conspicuously displayed in public areas at the schoolsite that are accessible to, and commonly frequented by, pupils, including, but not limited to, classrooms, classroom hallways, gymnasiums, auditoriums, and cafeterias.

(B) The governing board of a school district, governing body of a charter school, and county board of education shall have full discretion to select the appropriate public areas to display the poster at the schoolsite.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 370, Sec. 44.   (SB 1371)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

231.7.

The department shall make all of the following available on the department’s internet website:

(a) Resources on abuse, including sexual, emotional, and physical abuse, and teen dating violence prevention for professional learning purposes.

(b) Information about local and national hotlines and services for youth experiencing teen dating violence.

(c) Other relevant materials for parents, guardians, and other caretakers of pupils.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 65, Sec. 1.   (AB 1071)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4.5. Single Gender Schools and Classes [232. - 232.6.]

232.

The Legislature finds and declares that there are existing single gender schools and classes in California that may assist the state in evaluating whether or not single gender education aligned with Title IX of the Education Amendments of 1972 (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1681 et seq.) is beneficial to pupils.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 654, Sec. 1.   (AB 23)   Effective October 11, 2017.   Inoperative July 1, 2031.   Repealed as of January 1, 2032, pursuant to Section 232.6.)
-------------------------------------------

232.2.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding Section 220 as it relates to discrimination on the basis of gender, and subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 221.5, a school district with an average daily attendance of 250,000 or more pupils may maintain any single gender schools and classes that were enrolling pupils as of July 1, 2017, provided that the governing board of the school district has adopted a policy that addresses how the school district will ensure compliance with Title IX regulations (34 C.F.R. Part 106).

(2) Notwithstanding Section 220 as it relates to discrimination on the basis of gender, and subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 221.5, a charter school authorized by a school district with an average daily attendance of 250,000 or more pupils may be
 maintained as a single gender school or may maintain single gender classes, only if, as of July 1, 2017, the school operated as a single gender school or operated single gender classes, provided that the governing body of the charter school has adopted a policy that addresses how the charter school will ensure compliance with Title IX regulations (34 C.F.R. Part 106).

(3) (A) A school continuing to operate as a single gender school pursuant to this section shall not have a total pupil enrollment exceeding 700 pupils.

(B) A coeducational school maintaining existing single gender classes pursuant to this section shall not have a total pupil enrollment exceeding 1,000 pupils. This subparagraph shall not apply for single gender classes authorized pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 221.5 or of the kinds described in paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive, of
 subdivision (a) of Section 106.34 of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(4) Any corrective action ordered by the department before July 1, 2017, and applicable to a school maintained under this section shall remain in effect.

(5) A school continuing to operate a single gender class or as a single gender school pursuant to this section shall enroll pupils in the class or school, as applicable, based on the pupil’s gender identity.

(b) A policy adopted pursuant to subdivision (a) shall include, but not necessarily be limited to, all of the following requirements:

(1) The single gender aspect of the school or classes will serve an important school district or charter school objective to do either of the following:

(A) Improve the educational achievement of its pupils through the school district’s or charter school’s overall established policy to provide diverse educational opportunities, provided that the single gender nature of the school or classes is substantially related to achieving that objective.

(B) Meet the particular, identified educational needs of its pupils, provided that the single gender nature of the school or classes is substantially related to achieving that objective.

(2) The school district or charter school will implement its objective in an evenhanded manner.

(3) Pupil enrollment in a single gender school or classes will be voluntary.

(4) (A) Except as
 provided in subparagraph (B), the school district or charter school will provide to all pupils a substantially equal coeducational class, extracurricular activity, or program in the same subject.

(B) Subparagraph (A) shall not apply to a nonvocational charter school that is a single school that is not part of a network or chain of charter schools or a charter school management organization that has more than one school.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 373, Sec. 1.   (AB 2046)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Inoperative July 1, 2031.   Repealed as of January 1, 2032, pursuant to Section 232.6.)
-------------------------------------------

232.4.

(a) A school district that maintains an existing single gender school or classes or a charter school that is an existing single gender school or that continues existing single gender classes, pursuant to Section 232.2, shall conduct the following evaluations at least once every two years:

(1) An evaluation of whether the single gender aspect of the school or classes is based upon genuine justifications and does not rely on overly broad generalizations about the different talents, capacities, or preferences of different genders and that the single gender nature of the school or classes is substantially related to the achievement of the important objective for the school or classes.

(2) An evaluation
 that examines whether the single gender school or class has been effective as compared to coeducational schools.

(3) An evaluation of the impact of the single gender school or class on pupils who identify as lesbian, gay, bisexual, transgender, questioning, or gender nonconforming.

(b) The metrics that the school district or charter school will use to evaluate the single gender school or class shall be included in the policy adopted pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 232.2, and the evidence in the evaluation shall include, but need not be limited to, the evidence described in the United States Department of Education’s Office for Civil Rights “Questions and Answers on Title IX and Single-Sex Elementary and Secondary Classes and Extracurricular Activities” of December 1, 2014.

(c) The school district or charter
 school shall submit the findings of the evaluations required pursuant to subdivision (a) to the Senate Committee on Education, the Assembly Committee on Education, the Assembly Committee on Judiciary, the Senate Committee on Judiciary, and the department. The school district or charter school shall also make the evaluation findings available to the public on its internet website. In the event that the department finds that one or more of the single gender schools or single gender classes fail to comply with the requirements of Title IX regulations (34 C.F.R. Part 106), or the requirements of this section, the department shall order corrective action up to and including requiring that the school or classes become coeducational.

(d) Except as otherwise provided in this article and subdivision (b) of Section 221.5, no public elementary or secondary school, including a charter school, shall operate as a single gender school or with single gender
 classes. This subdivision does not prohibit the operation of single gender classes of the kinds described in paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive, of subdivision (a) of Section 106.34 of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 373, Sec. 2.   (AB 2046)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Inoperative July 1, 2031.   Repealed as of January 1, 2032, pursuant to Section 232.6.)
-------------------------------------------

232.6.

This article shall become inoperative on July 1, 2031, and as of January 1, 2032, is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 373, Sec. 3.   (AB 2046)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Inoperative July 1, 2031, by its own provisions.   Repealed as of January 1, 2032, by its own provisions.    Note: Repeal affects Article 4.5, commencing with Section 232.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4.7. Body Shaming [232.7. - 232.7.]

232.7.

(a) (1) (A) On or before June 30, 2025, the State Department of Education, in consultation with the California Health and Human Services Agency, the Behavioral Health Services Oversight and Accountability Commission, and other relevant stakeholders, shall develop and post on its internet website a model policy and resources about body shaming that is appropriate for schools that serve pupils in kindergarten or any of grades 1 to 12, inclusive, and that local educational agencies may use to educate staff and pupils about the issue of body shaming.

(B) The State Department of Education, in consultation with the California Health and Human Services Agency, the Behavioral Health Services Oversight and Accountability
 Commission, and other relevant stakeholders, may use existing resources or frameworks, or both, about body shaming or body image, or both, to meet the requirements of subparagraph (A).

(2) Local educational agencies are encouraged to inform teachers, staff, parents, and pupils about the resources developed pursuant to subdivision (a), including, but not limited to, by providing information in pupil and employee handbooks and making the information available on each schoolsite’s internet website.

(b) For purposes of this article, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Body shaming” means the action or practice of mocking or stigmatizing a person by making critical comments or observations about the shape, size, or appearance of the person’s body.

(2) “Local educational agency” means a school district, county office of education, or charter school.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 243, Sec. 1.   (SB 862)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Hate Violence Prevention Act [233. - 233.8.]

233.

(a) At the request of the Superintendent of Public Instruction, the State Board of Education shall do all of the following as long as the board’s actions do not result in a state mandate or an increase in costs to a state or local program:

(1) Adopt policies directed toward creating a school environment in kindergarten and grades 1 to 12, inclusive, that is free from discriminatory attitudes and practices and acts of hate violence.

(2) Revise, as needed, and in accordance with the State Board of Education’s adopted Schedule for Curriculum Framework Development and Adoption of Instructional Materials developed pursuant to Section 60200, the state curriculum frameworks and guidelines and the moral and civic education curricula to include human relations education, with the aim of fostering an appreciation of the diversity of California’s population and discouraging the development of discriminatory attitudes and practices.

(3) Establish guidelines for use in teacher and administrator in-service training programs to promote an appreciation of diversity and to discourage the development of discriminatory attitudes and practices that prevent pupils from achieving their full potential.

(4) Establish guidelines for use in teacher and administrator
 in-service training programs designed to enable teachers and administrators to prevent and respond to acts of hate violence occurring on their school campuses.

(5) Establish guidelines designed to raise the awareness and sensitivity of teachers, administrators, and school employees to potentially prejudicial and discriminatory behavior and to encourage the participation of these groups in these programs.

(6) Develop guidelines relating to the development of nondiscriminatory instructional and counseling methods.

(7) Revise any appropriate guidelines previously adopted by the board to include procedures for preventing and responding to acts of hate violence.

(b) The State Department of Education, in accordance with policies established by the State Board
 of Education for purposes of this subdivision, shall do all of the following:

(1) Prepare guidelines for the design and implementation of local programs and instructional curricula that promote understanding, awareness, and appreciation of the contributions of people with diverse backgrounds and of harmonious relations in a diverse society. The guidelines shall include methods of evaluating the programs and curricula and suggested procedures to ensure coordination of the programs and curricula with appropriate local public and private agencies.

(2) Provide grants, from funds appropriated for that purpose, to school districts and county offices of education to develop programs and curricula consistent with the guidelines developed in paragraph (1).

(3) To the extent possible, provide advice and direct services,
 consistent with the guidelines developed in paragraph (1), to school districts and county offices of education that implement the programs and curricula developed in paragraph (2).

(c) The State Board of Education shall carry out this section only if private funds, in an amount sufficient to pay for related State Department of Education staff activities on behalf of the board, are made available.

(d) Nothing in this section shall be construed to require the governing board of a school district to offer any ethnic studies or human relations courses in the district.

(e) As used in this section, “hate violence” means any act punishable under Section 422.6, 422.7, or 422.75 of the Penal Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 955, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

233.5.

(a) Each teacher shall endeavor to impress upon the minds of the pupils the principles of morality, truth, justice, patriotism, and a true comprehension of the rights, duties, and dignity of American citizenship, and the meaning of equality and human dignity, including the promotion of harmonious relations, kindness toward domestic pets and the humane treatment of living creatures, to teach them to avoid idleness, profanity, and falsehood, and to instruct them in manners and morals and the principles of a free government.

(b) Each teacher is also encouraged to create and foster an environment that encourages pupils to realize their full potential and that is free from discriminatory attitudes, practices, events, or activities, in order to prevent acts of hate violence, as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 233.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 44806 by Stats. 1998, Ch. 914, Sec. 42.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

233.8.

(a) The State Department of Education shall provide regional training to assist school district personnel in the identification and determination of hate violence on school campuses.

(b) (1) A grant program for school districts shall be established by the department for the purpose of enabling pupils and teachers to participate in educational programs focused on fostering ethnic sensitivity, overcoming racism and prejudice, and countering hatred and
 intolerance. It is the intent of the Legislature that the grants be awarded on a competitive basis with similar sized school districts and county offices of education competing against each other for grant funds. The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall establish grant competition bands as follows:

(A) Districts with less than 2,501 average daily attendance.

(B) Districts with more than 2,500 average daily attendance but less than 5,001.

(C) Districts with more than 5,000 average daily attendance but less than 15,001.

(D) Districts with more than 15,000 average daily attendance but less than 30,001.

(E) Districts with more than 30,000 average daily attendance.

(F) County offices of education.

(2) The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall allocate the appropriated funds for competitive grants to each of the competitive bands based on the amount of average daily attendance in all districts in the competitive range compared to the statewide average daily attendance in all school districts and county offices of education.

The grant program is not required to be implemented under this section unless funds are appropriated for that purpose.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 959, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5.5. Safe Place to Learn Act [234. - 234.5.]

234.

(a) This article shall be known, and may be cited, as the Safe Place to Learn Act.

(b) It is the policy of the State of California to ensure that all local educational agencies continue to work to reduce discrimination, harassment, violence, intimidation, and bullying. It is further the policy of the state to improve
 pupil safety at schools and the connections between pupils and supportive adults, schools, and communities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 723, Sec. 1.   (AB 9)   Effective January 1, 2012.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 8 of Ch. 723.)
-------------------------------------------

234.1.
